Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.815

Vested membership.

A member who separates or has separated after having completed at least five years of service may remain a member during the period of such member's absence from service for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.32.765 if such member maintains the member's accumulated contributions intact.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.